Massachusetts, session 194th, H3321.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
"SECTION XX: Section 15 of chapter 36, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended, by striking out, in line 6, the words "microphotographic process".
SECTION XX: Said section 15 of said chapter 36, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 8, after the word "entered", the words:- in a format approved by
the Secretary of the Commonwealth".
of 1